Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HELPING PAWS; APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General fund. new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to Helping Paws, Inc., to breed, train, and place service or facility dogs with individuals who have physical disabilities; veterans and first responders living with service-related post-traumatic stress disorder; and professionals in courthouse, educational, and mental health settings. This is a onetime honorarium appropriation in memory of Speaker Emerita Melissa Hortman. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Private donations. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health may accept private donations to supplement the state money appropriated under subdivision 1. All money accepted by the commissioner under this subdivision must be deposited in a dedicated account in the special revenue fund and is appropriated to the commissioner for purposes of this section. The account expires on July 1, 2028. new text end